Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3970
Act; administration and enforcement.

The Nebraska Milk Act shall be administered and enforced by the department.

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3904;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 6.